Idaho, session 2026, S1353.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6541, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6541. TWIN HOMES AND DUPLEXES. (1) No city shall enact or enforce
any ordinance within its jurisdiction that bans twin homes or duplexes in
any residential zoning district where single-family dwellings are permit-
ted. "Twin home" means a residential building that consists of two (2) sep-
arate living units that share a wall but where each unit is independently
owned and maintained and where each owner owns the underlying land in fee
simple ownership.
(2) By February 1, 2027, by resolution or ordinance adopted, amended,
or repealed in accordance with the notice and hearing procedures provided
pursuant to section 67-6509, Idaho Code, each city governing board shall
amend its comprehensive plan and land use regulations for all land zoned
for single-family residential uses, except for lands falling within an area
defined as a historic district under section 67-4607, Idaho Code, or desig-
nated as a historic property pursuant to section 67-4614, Idaho Code, to:
(a) Permit the development of twin homes and duplexes on any lot where a
detached single-family dwelling is permitted;
(b) Prohibit imposing minimum lot size requirements that would effec-
tively prohibit twin homes or duplexes on a lot where a detached sin-
gle-family dwelling is permitted;
(c) Prohibit requiring more than one (1) off-street parking space per
dwelling unit, provided that the lot is on a street that is paved and
designed or constructed for on-street parking or is within one-fourth
(1/4) mile of transit, an available designated parking area, an employ-
ment area, or commercial services; and
(d) Prohibit imposing impact fees or utility connection fees on twin
homes or duplexes by unit that are greater than those imposed on sin-
gle-family dwellings.
(3) Twin home or duplex projects that meet the jurisdiction's estab-
lished land use requirements shall be approved administratively and as a
matter of right, without the need for discretionary approval, in the same
manner as a single-family dwelling, provided that there are no infrastruc-
ture constraints or emergency access or international fire code conflicts.
Cities may require minimum lot frontage of twenty-five (25) to thirty (30)


feet to allow for utility connections spacing requirements, to accommo-
date off-street parking, if provided, and to allow increased setbacks if
on-street snow storage is impractical due to road width. Cities may impose
objective maximum impervious coverage ratios and on-site stormwater reten-
tion standards.
(4) Any approval standards, special conditions, and procedures for ap-
proval adopted by a local government shall be clear and objective and shall
not have the effect, either singularly or cumulatively, of discouraging the
development of twin homes or duplexes through unreasonable cost or delay.
Such standards shall not be more restrictive than those applicable to de-
tached single-family dwellings.
(5) The provisions of this section shall apply only to cities with a
population greater than ten thousand (10,000).
(6) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a city from enacting regula-
tions, standards, or conditions that are less restrictive than the require-
ments of this section.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not supersede state or local
laws that protect public health, safety, and welfare, including:
(a) Building codes, fire safety standards, and flood plain regula-
tions;
(b) Laws regarding water, sewer, storm drainage, road access, roadway
classification or conditions, infrastructure capacity constraints,
and utility services necessary to support the required density;
(c) Laws regarding environmental hazards, aquifer recharge zones,
steep slopes, and critical habitat protections; and
(d) Laws and regulations regarding setback requirements for rights-of-
way and easements.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.